Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.100

Decisions of school materials subject to chapter.

In accordance with RCW 28A.320.233, decisions by school district boards of directors, charter school boards under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW that pertain to textbooks, instructional materials, supplemental instructional materials, and other curriculum for student instruction may be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 316 s 7.]